Utah statutes.
39-3-2.   Government employees in United States armed forces or National Guard -- Pay allowance for time spent on duty -- Deduction of vacation time prohibited.

(1)  All state employees who are members of the organized reserve of the United States armed forces, including the National Guard of this state, shall be allowed full pay for all time not in excess of 15 days per year spent on duty at annual encampment or rifle competition or other duties in connection with the reserve training and instruction requirements of the armed forces of the United States, including the National Guard of this state.  This leave shall be in addition to any annual vacation leave with pay to which an employee may be entitled.

(2)  County and municipal employees who are members of the organized reserve of the United States armed forces, including the National Guard of this state, may be allowed up to full pay for all time not in excess of 15 days per year spent on duty at annual encampment or rifle competition or other duties in connection with the reserve training and instruction requirements of the armed forces of the United States, including the National Guard of this state.  This leave is at the discretion of the employing county or municipality and, if granted, shall be in addition to annual vacation leave with pay.



Amended by Chapter 217, 2003 General Session

